Vermont, session 2025-2026, H719.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 9405d is added to read:
§ 9405d. HOSPITAL COLLABORATION; STATE ACTION IMMUNITY
(a) Intent. It is the intent of the General Assembly that hospital and health
system collaboration efforts that meet the requirements of this section be
afforded state action immunity under applicable federal and State laws. This
immunity is in addition to the hospital cost containment conduct afforded state
action immunity under subdivision 9456(d)(2) of this title.
(b) Qualifying conduct. Conduct undertaken by rural hospitals, community
hospitals, and health systems, or a combination of them, for the purposes of
cost containment, improved access to care, quality improvement, preservation
of rural or community hospitals, advancement of the State Health Care
Delivery Strategic Plan, once established, or enhancement of any existing
health care initiative in a manner that is consistent with the principles
expressed in section 9371 of this title shall be afforded state action immunity
from criminal and civil litigation under applicable federal and State antitrust
laws if the conduct meets all of the following conditions:
(1) the Secretary of Human Services authorizes the parties to explore
opportunities to collaborate to achieve one or more of the purposes set forth in
this subsection;
VT LEG #386114 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.719
2026 Page 3 of 10
(2) the Secretary of Human Services deems any initiatives proposed by
the collaborating parties as a result of their authorized collaboration to be
consistent with the State’s health policy goals;
(3) the Secretary of Human Services approves each initiative proposed
by the parties prior to its implementation; and
(4) the Agency of Human Services actively supervises the parties’
conduct throughout the collaboration and implementation of the approved
initiatives, as set forth in subsection (d) of this section.
(c) Information sharing. Hospitals and health systems participating in
discussions and collaborations approved under this section may share cost,
utilization, workforce, and quality data as necessary to achieve the purposes of
the collaboration. This information sharing shall not be deemed a violation of
federal or State antitrust law.
(d) Process for approval; State supervision.
(1) A hospital seeking to collaborate with another hospital or a health
system in a manner that the hospital determines may violate State or federal
antitrust law shall seek approval from the Secretary of Human Services prior to
engaging in such collaboration. Separate approval shall be required for the
parties to discuss and explore opportunities to work together to further the
State’s health policy goals, using the process set forth in subdivision (2) of this
subsection, and for implementation of any initiatives developed pursuant to
VT LEG #386114 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.719
2026 Page 4 of 10
these discussions, using the process set forth in subdivision (3) of this
subsection.
(2)(A) A hospital interested in exploring potential collaboration with
one or more hospitals or health systems shall submit an application to the
Secretary of Human Services describing the proposed collaboration and
specifying the manner in which the proposed activity would further Vermont’s
health policy goals and achieve one or more of the purposes set forth in
subsection (b) of this section.
(B)(i) The Secretary shall review the proposed collaboration and may
request additional information from the applicant or request an informal
hearing, or both.
(ii) Within 30 days following receipt of the proposal, the Secretary
shall approve, approve with conditions, or reject the proposed collaboration.
Approval or approval with conditions shall constitute the Secretary’s
determination that the proposed collaboration is consistent with the State’s
health policy goals and is likely to achieve one or more of the purposes set
forth in subsection (b) of this section.
(iii) If the Secretary rejects the proposal, the Secretary’s decision
shall set forth the basis for the rejection and the ways in which the proposed
collaboration fails to align with or further the State’s health policy goals or to
achieve any of the purposes set forth in subsection (b) of this section.
VT LEG #386114 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.719
2026 Page 5 of 10
(C) The Secretary may order a hospital or health system engaged in
an approved collaboration to obtain, at the hospital’s or health system’s own
expense, the services of a third-party aggregator or facilitator as a condition of
approval.
(D) If the Secretary approves a proposed collaboration under this
subdivision (2), with or without conditions, the collaborating parties shall
report to the Agency of Human Services at least quarterly, or more frequently
if required by the Agency, describing material developments related to the
collaboration. The reports shall include any third-party reports related to the
collaboration if an aggregator or facilitator is required as a condition of
approval.
(3)(A) If the parties to a collaboration approved pursuant to subdivision
(2) of this subsection (d) develop proposed initiatives to further the State’s
health policy goals and to achieve one or more of the purposes set forth in
subsection (b) of this section, the parties shall submit a joint application
describing the proposed initiatives to the Secretary of Human Services for
approval. The application shall include:
(i) the names of the parties to the proposed initiative;
(ii) how each proposed initiative would further the State’s health
policy goals and achieve cost containment, improved access to care, quality
improvement, preservation of rural or community hospitals, advancement of
VT LEG #386114 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.719
2026 Page 6 of 10
the State Health Care Delivery Strategic Plan, once established, or
enhancement of an existing initiative in a manner that is consistent with the
principles expressed in section 9371 of this title, or a combination of these;
(iii) the expected impact of each proposed initiative on patients,
providers, payers, and the State; and
(iv) a timeline for implementation.
(B)(i) The Secretary shall review the application and may request
additional information from the applicants or request an informal hearing, or
both.
(ii)(I) Within 60 days following receipt of the application, the
Secretary shall approve, approve with conditions, or reject the proposed
initiative or initiatives. Approval or approval with conditions shall constitute
the Secretary’s determination that the proposed initiative or initiatives are
consistent with the State’s health policy goals and are likely to achieve one or
more of the purposes set forth in subsection (b) of this section.
(II) If the Secretary rejects the application, the Secretary’s
decision shall set forth the basis for the rejection and the ways in which the
proposed initiative or initiatives fail to align with or further the State’s health
policy goals or to achieve any of the purposes set forth in subsection (b) of this
section.
VT LEG #386114 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.719
2026 Page 7 of 10
(iii) The Secretary may order the parties to obtain, at the parties’
own expense, the services of a third-party aggregator or facilitator as a
condition of approval.
(C) The parties shall continue to report to the Agency of Human
Services at least quarterly, or more frequently if required by the Agency,
throughout the course of any initiative or initiatives approved pursuant to this
subdivision (3).
(D) The Secretary may revoke approval or require submission of
additional materials at any time upon finding that the collaborative conduct is
inconsistent with the State’s health policy goals, is not on track to achieve any
of the purposes set forth in subsection (b) of this section, or materially deviates
from the original application.
(4) Actions taken in furtherance of a collaboration approved by the
Secretary under subdivision (2) or (3) of this subsection may occur without the
presence or involvement of any State employee, provided the parties:
(A) report their activities to the Agency as required by Agency under
this subsection (d);
(B) submit any additional materials reasonably requested by the
Agency during the course of the collaboration;
VT LEG #386114 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.719
2026 Page 8 of 10
(C) obtain additional approval from the Secretary prior to engaging in
any collaborative activities that exceed or deviate from those approved by the
Secretary; and
(D) ensure that their efforts continue to be aligned with and in
furtherance of the State’s health policy goals.
(e) Confidentiality of materials.
(1) Except as specified in subdivision (2) of this subsection, all
applications, reports, analyses, and other materials submitted to or generated
by the Agency of Human Services in connection with a proposed, approved, or
rejected collaboration under this section are exempt from public inspection and
copying under the Public Records Act, are presumed to contain proprietary or
competitively sensitive information, and shall be kept confidential, unless a
hospital or health system specifies that any of the materials should not be
considered exempt or kept confidential.
(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, the Agency may
make publicly available the fact of an approval under this section and the
general nature and purpose of an approved collaboration, as well as any
findings necessary to demonstrate compliance with State policy objectives,
provided the Agency strives to strike a reasonable balance between the
confidentiality of proprietary or competitively sensitive information and the
public interest in transparency.
VT LEG #386114 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.719
2026 Page 9 of 10
(f) Notice to Attorney General. The Agency of Human Services shall
provide annual written notice to the Office of the Attorney General of the
hospitals and health systems whose collaborations were approved, approved
with conditions, rejected, or revoked under this section during the preceding
year, along with a description of the general nature of each collaboration. The
notice shall not disclose proprietary or competitively sensitive information
protected pursuant to subsection (e) of this section.
Sec. 2. 9 V.S.A. § 2453 is amended to read:
§ 2453. PRACTICES PROHIBITED; ANTITRUST AND CONSUMER
PROTECTION
(a) Unfair methods of competition in commerce and unfair or deceptive
acts or practices in commerce are hereby declared unlawful.
(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that in construing subsection (a) of this
section, the courts of this State will be guided by the construction of similar
terms contained in Section 5(a)(1) of the Federal Trade Commission Act as
from time to time amended by the Federal Trade Commission and the courts of
the United States.
(c) The Attorney General shall adopt rules, when necessary and proper to
carry out the purposes of this chapter, relating to unfair methods of competition
in commerce and unfair or deceptive acts or practices in commerce. The rules
shall not be inconsistent with the rules, regulations, and decisions of the
VT LEG #386114 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.719
2026 Page 10 of 10
Federal Trade Commission and the federal courts interpreting the Federal
Trade Commission Act.
(d) Violation of a rule adopted by the Attorney General is prima facie proof
of the commission of an unfair or deceptive act in commerce.
(e) The provisions of subsections (a), (c), and (d) of this section shall also
be applicable to real estate transactions.
(f) The provisions of this section shall not apply to hospital and health
system collaborations that comply with the requirements of 18 V.S.A. § 9405d.
Sec. 3. 9 V.S.A. § 2453a is amended to read:
§ 2453a. PRACTICES PROHIBITED; CRIMINAL ANTITRUST
VIOLATIONS
(a) Collusion is hereby declared to be a crime.
(b) Subsection (a) of this section shall not be construed to apply to
activities of or arrangements between or among persons that are permitted,
authorized, approved, or required by federal or state statutes or regulations,
including hospital and health system collaborations that comply with the
requirements of 18 V.S.A. § 9405d.
* * *
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #386114 v.1